Mississippi statutes. Title 87. Contracts and Contractual Relations
Chapter 7. Improvements to Real Property

§ 87-7-1.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1985, ch. 505, § 16, effective from and after January 1, 1986.

[En, Laws, 1985, ch. 335]

§ 87-7-3.
Payment of contractors; penalty for late payment.

All sums due contractors under all construction contracts, except public construction contracts, shall be paid as follows:

Partial, progress or interim payments: all partial, progress or interim payments or monies owed contractors shall be paid when due and payable under the terms of the contract. If they are not paid within thirty (30) calendar days from the day they were due and payable, then they shall bear interest from the due date at the rate of one percent (1%) per month until fully paid.

Final payments: The final payment of all monies owed contractors shall be due and payable:

At the completion of the project or after the work has been substantially completed in accordance with the terms and provisions of the contract;

When the owner beneficially uses or occupies the project except in the case where the project involves renovation or alteration to an existing facility in which the owner maintains beneficial use or occupancy during the course of the project; or

When the project is certified as having been completed by the architect or engineer authorized to make such certification, whichever event shall first occur.

If the contractor is not paid in full within thirty (30) calendar days from the first occurrence of one (1) of the above-mentioned events, then the final payment shall bear interest from the date of such first occurrence at the rate of one percent (1%) per month until fully paid.

In no event shall the final payment due the contractor be made until the consent of the contractor’s surety has been obtained in writing and delivered to the proper contracting authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 505, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 330, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 87-7-5.
Proportional payment of subcontractors; penalty for late payment.

When a contractor receives any payment from the owner under a construction contract, other than a public construction contract, the contractor shall, upon receipt of that payment, pay each subcontractor and material supplier in proportion to the percentage of work completed by each such subcontractor and material supplier. If for any reason the contractor receives less than the full payment due from the owner, the contractor shall be obligated to disburse on a pro rata basis those funds received, with the contractor, subcontractors and material suppliers each receiving a prorated portion based on the amount due on the payment. If the contractor without reasonable cause fails to make any payment to his subcontractors and material suppliers within fifteen (15) days after the receipt of payment from the owner under the construction contract, the contractor shall pay to his subcontractors and material suppliers, in addition to the payment due them, a penalty in the amount of one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) per day of the delinquency, calculated from the expiration of the fifteen-day period until fully paid. The total penalty shall not exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the outstanding balance due. The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to contracts for the construction of single-family dwellings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 505, § 4; Laws, 2006, ch. 330, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 87-7-7.
Contractor negotiation of draft payable to contractor and other parties; written signed authorization of co-payees required; penalties.

A contractor who undertakes to negotiate a draft made payable to the contractor and any other party must first obtain an endorsement or other written signed authorization of every co-payee on the draft if the draft is tendered in payment for materials or equipment furnished or labor performed by the owner, laborer, supplier or equipment dealer.

A contractor who negotiates a draft without first obtaining an endorsement or other written signed authorization required under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per violation, and shall also be ordered by the court to make full restitution to the owner, laborer, supplier or equipment dealer who is entitled to payment from the proceeds of the draft, as well as reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by any party to whom restitution is ordered.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 506, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 87-7-9.
Contracts, subcontracts or purchase orders with provisions relating to real property improvement that make the contract subject to laws of another state or restrict forum for litigation, arbitration or dispute resolution to another state are void; applicability.

A provision in any contract, subcontract, or purchase order for the improvement of real property in this state, or to provide materials therefor, is void and against public policy if it makes the contract, subcontract, or purchase order subject to the laws of another state, or provides that the exclusive forum for any litigation, arbitration, or other dispute resolution process be located in another state.

The provisions of this section apply only to contracts, agreements and purchase orders:

Entered into on or after July 1, 2018;

Only if at least one (1) of the parties is a Mississippi resident; and

Only if entered into between any two (2) or more of the following persons and no others: the owner of the real property improved or to be improved, a contractor, subcontractor, materialman or design professional. As used in this section, “contractor”, “subcontractor”, “materialman” and “design professional” shall have the meanings ascribed in Section 85-7-401.

For purposes of this section, “Mississippi resident” means any natural person domiciled in Mississippi or any business entity having a principal place of business in Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 455, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.